Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.744

[Art. 107] False official statements.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 105.]